pt-BR: Software > Software de computador > Software de negócios e de produtividade: Software de comunicação e colaboração; Software de gestão de relacionamento com o cliente (CRM); Software de análise e visualização de dados; Software de gestão de banco de dados; Software de planejamento de recursos empresariais (ERP); Software de gestão de projetos
sk-SK: Softvér > Počítačový softvér > Softvér pre obchod a produktivitu: Softvér na komunikáciu a spoluprácu; Softvér na riadenie vzťahov so zákazníkmi (CRM); Softvér na analýzu a vizualizáciu údajov; Softvér na správu databázy; Softvér na plánovanie podnikových zdrojov (ERP); Softvér na riadenie projektov
lt-LT: Programinė įranga > Kompiuterių programinė įranga > Verslo ir produktyvumo programinė įranga: Bendravimo ir bendradarbiavimo programinė įranga; Ryšių su klientais valdymo (CRM) programinė įranga; Duomenų analizės ir vizualizavimo programinė įranga; Duomenų bazių valdymo programinė įranga; Įmonės išteklių planavimo (ERP) programinė įranga; Projektų valdymo programinė įranga
ru: Программное обеспечение > Программное обеспечение для компьютеров > Программное обеспечение для работы и бизнеса: Программное обеспечение для коммуникации и совместной работы; Программное обеспечение для управления отношениями с клиентами (CRM); Программное обеспечение для анализа и визуализации данных; Программное обеспечение для управления базами данных; Программное обеспечение для планирования ресурсов предприятия (ERP); Программное обеспечение для управления проектами
fr: Logiciels > Logiciels informatiques > Logiciels d'entreprise et de productivité: Logiciels de communication et de collaboration; Logiciel de gestion de la relation client (CRM); Logiciel d’analyse et de visualisation de données; Logiciel de gestion de base de données; Logiciel de planification des ressources d’entreprise; Logiciel de gestion de projet
zh-CN: 软件 > 电脑软件 > 商务软件和办公软件: 通讯与协作软件; 客户关系管理 (CRM) 软件; 数据分析与可视化软件; 数据库管理软件; 企业资源规划 (ERP) 软件; 项目管理软件
ko: 소프트웨어 > 컴퓨터 소프트웨어 > 비즈니스/생산성 소프트웨어: 커뮤니케이션/협업 소프트웨어; 고객 관계 관리(CRM) 소프트웨어; 데이터 분석/시각화 소프트웨어; 데이터베이스 관리 소프트웨어; 전사적 자원 관리(ERP) 소프트웨어; 프로젝트 관리 소프트웨어
es: Software > Software informático > Software corporativo y de productividad: Software de comunicación y colaboración; Software de gestión de las relaciones con los clientes; Software de análisis y visualización de datos; Software de gestión de base de datos; Software de planificación de recursos empresariales (ERP); Software de gestión de proyectos
hr-HR: Softver > Računalni softver > Softver za poslovanje i produktivnost: Softver za komunikaciju i suradnju; Softver za upravljanje odnosima s kupcima; Softver za analizu i vizualizaciju podataka; Softver za upravljanje bazom podataka; Softver za planiranje resursa poduzeća; Softver za upravljanje projektima
pl: Oprogramowanie > Programy komputerowe > Programy dla firm i do pracy: Oprogramowanie do komunikacji i współpracy; Oprogramowanie do zarządzania relacjami z klientami (CRM); Oprogramowanie do analizy i wizualizacji danych; Oprogramowanie do zarządzania bazami danych; Oprogramowanie do planowania zasobów przedsiębiorstwa (ERP); Oprogramowanie do zarządzania projektami
hu: Szoftver > Számítógépes szoftver > Üzleti és termelékenységi szoftver: Kommunikációs és együttműködési szoftver; Ügyfélkapcsolat-kezelő (CRM) szoftver; Adatelemző és -vizualizáló szoftver; Adatbázis-kezelő szoftver; Vállalati erőforrás-tervező (ERP) szoftver; Projektmenedzsment szoftver
en: Software > Computer Software > Business & Productivity Software: Communication & Collaboration Software; Customer Relationship Management (CRM) Software; Data Analysis & Visualization Software; Database Management Software; Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) Software; Project Management Software
de: Software > Computersoftware > Unternehmens- & Produktivitätssoftware: Software für Kommunikation und Zusammenarbeit; Customer-Relationship-Management(CRM)-Software; Datenanalyse- und Visualisierungssoftware; Datenbankmanagementsoftware; Enterprise Resource Planning(ERP)-Software; Projektmanagement-Software
tr: Yazılım > Bilgisayar Yazılımları > İş ve Verimlilik Yazılımları: İletişim ve İşbirliği Yazılımı; Müşteri İlişkileri Yönetimi (CRM) Yazılımı; Veri Analizi ve Görselleştirme Yazılımı; Veri Tabanı Yönetim Yazılımı; Kurumsal Kaynak Planlama (ERP) Yazılımı; Proje Yönetim Yazılımı
cs: Software > Počítačový software > Pracovní a produktivní software: Software pro komunikaci a spolupráci; Software pro řízení vztahů se zákazníky (CRM).; Software pro analýzu a vizualizaci dat; Software pro správu databází; Software pro plánování podnikových zdrojů (ERP).; Software pro řízení projektů
bg-BG: Софтуер > Компютърен софтуер > Софтуер за бизнес и производителност: Софтуер за комуникация и сътрудничество; Софтуер за управление на взаимоотношенията с клиенти (CRM); Софтуер за анализ и визуализация на данни; Софтуер за управление на бази данни; Софтуер за планиране на корпоративни ресурси (ERP); Софтуер за управление на проекти
nl: Software > Computersoftware > Bedrijfs- en productiviteitssoftware: Communicatie- en samenwerkingssoftware; CRM-software (Customer Relationship Management); Software voor gegevensanalyse en visualisatie; Databasebeheersoftware; ERP-software (Enterprise Resource Planning).; Projectbeheersoftware
da: Software > Computersoftware > Forretnings- og produktivitetssoftware: Software til kommunikation og samarbejde; Software til administration af kunderelationer (CRM); Software til dataanalyse og visualisering; Software til databasestyring; Software til Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP); Software til projektledelse
sv: Programvara > Datorprogramvara > Företags- och produktivitetsprogram: Programvara för kommunikation och samarbete; Programvara för kundvårdssystem (CRM); Programvara för dataanalys och visualisering; Programvara för databashantering; Affärssystem (ERP); Programvara för projektledning
ja: ソフトウェア > PCソフト > ビジネスソフト: 通信&コラボレーションソフトウェア; 顧客関係管理 (CRM) ソフトウェア; データ分析&可視化ソフトウェア; データベース管理ソフトウェア; エンタープライズリソースプランニング (ERP) ソフトウェア; プロジェクト管理ソフトウェア
ro-RO: Software > Software de calculator > Software pentru afaceri și productivitate: Software de comunicare și colaborare; Software de management al relațiilor cu clienții (CRM).; Software de analiză și vizualizare a datelor; Software de gestionare a bazelor de date; Software de planificare a resurselor întreprinderii (ERP).; Software de management de proiect
vi: Phần mềm > Phần mềm máy tính > Phần mềm kinh doanh và tăng năng suất: Phần mềm giao tiếp và cộng tác; Phần mềm quản lý quan hệ khách hàng (CRM); Phần mềm phân tích và hiển thị dữ liệu; Phần mềm quản lý cơ sở dữ liệu; Phần mềm hoạch định nguồn lực doanh nghiệp (ERP); Phần mềm quản lý dự án
it: Software > Software per computer > Software per le aziende e la produttività: Software di comunicazione e collaborazione; Software di gestione delle relazioni con i clienti (CRM); Software di analisi e visualizzazione dei dati; Software di gestione del database; Software di pianificazione delle risorse aziendali (ERP).; Software di project management
el: Λογισμικό > Λογισμικό υπολογιστών > Λογισμικό επιχειρήσεων & παραγωγικότητας: Λογισμικό επικοινωνίας & συνεργασίας; Λογισμικό διαχείρισης πελατειακών σχέσεων (CRM); Λογισμικό ανάλυσης δεδομένων & οπτικοποίησης; Λογισμικό διαχείρισης βάσεων δεδομένων; Λογισμικό διαχείρισης επιχειρησιακών πόρων (ERP); Λογισμικό διαχείρισης έργων
sl-SI: Programska oprema > Računalniška programska oprema > Programska oprema za poslovanje in produktivnost: Programska oprema za komunikacijo in sodelovanje; Programska oprema za upravljanje odnosov s strankami (CRM); Programska oprema za analizo in vizualizacijo podatkov; Programska oprema za upravljanje zbirk podatkov; Programska oprema za načrtovanje virov poslovne organizacije (ERP); Programska oprema za upravljanje projektov
pt-PT: Software > Software de computador > Software de produtividade e negócios: Software de comunicação e colaboração; Software de gestão de relação com o cliente (CRM); Software de análise e visualização de dados; Software de gestão de bases de dados; Software de planeamento de recursos empresariais (ERP); Software de gestão de projeto
th: ซอฟต์แวร์ > ซอฟต์แวร์คอมพิวเตอร์ > ซอฟต์แวร์ทางธุรกิจและประสิทธิภาพ: ซอฟต์แวร์การสื่อสารและการทำงานร่วมกัน; ซอฟต์แวร์การบริหารความสัมพันธ์กับลูกค้า (CRM); ซอฟต์แวร์การวิเคราะห์ข้อมูลและแสดงผลเป็นภาพ; ซอฟต์แวร์การจัดการฐานข้อมูล; ซอฟต์แวร์การวางแผนทรัพยากรขององค์กร (ERP); ซอฟต์แวร์การจัดการโครงการ
nb: Programvare > Dataprogramvare > Forretnings- og produktivitetsprogramvare: Programvare for kommunikasjon og samarbeid; Programvare for kunderelasjonsstyring (CRM); Programvare for dataanalyse og visualisering; Programvare for databasehåndtering; Programvare for forretningsressursplanlegging (ERP); Programvare for prosjektledelse
zh-TW: 軟體 > 電腦軟體 > 商業生產力軟體: 通訊/協作軟體; 客戶關係管理 (CRM) 軟體; 數據分析/視覺化軟體; 資料庫管理軟體; 企業資源規劃 (ERP) 軟體; 專案管理軟體
fi: Ohjelmisto > Tietokoneohjelmisto > Yritys- ja tuottavuusohjelmistot: Viestintä- ja yhteistyöohjelmisto; Asiakkuudenhallinta (CRM) -ohjelmisto; Data-analytiikka- ja visualisointiohjelmisto; Tietokannan hallintaohjelmisto; Yrityksen resurssisuunnittelu (ERP) -ohjelmisto; Projektinhallintaohjelmisto